Hawaii statutes.
§653-1 Government beneficiary defined.
Any officer or employee, or other person in the service of the government of
the State, or of any political or municipal subdivision thereof, or in receipt
of, or entitled to a salary, stipend, or wages, from the State, or any
department, board, or bureau thereof, or from any political or municipal
subdivision of the State, shall for the purposes of this chapter, and of any
proceedings hereunder, be known and described as a government beneficiary,
hereinafter denominated such beneficiary. [L 1890, c 50, §1; am L 1903, c 53,
§1; am L 1921, c 66, §1; RL 1925, §2845; RL 1935, §4290; RL 1945, §10321; RL
1955, §238-1; HRS §653-1]

Cross References

Garnishment proceedings against the retirement system, see
§88-92.

Attorney General Opinions

Monies owed by State to vendor under public contract not
garnishable. Att. Gen. Op. 72-12.

Case Notes

But for this statute, garnishment would not lie, as there is
no privity of contract between disbursing officer and beneficiary. 2 H. 80
(1858).

Contractor to whom government owes balance for building
bridge is not government beneficiary. 9 H. 195 (1893).

No garnishee process against Territory, except as provided by
this chapter. 16 H. 106, 109 (1904).

Every government official, legislative, judicial, or
executive included if entitled to salary. 19 H. 428, 429 (1909); 31 H. 1014
(1931).

Not violative of Fourteenth Amendment of U.S. Constitution.
19 H. 428, 430 (1909).

Municipal corporation like private corporation subject to
process of garnishment. 23 H. 564, 570 (1916).

Lessees of Hawaiian Homes Commission, which holds proceeds of
pineapple sales, are not government beneficiaries within meaning of this
section, but the proceeds may be reached by a creditor's bill. 37 H. 8, 12
(1944).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next